vim/st.aff
FLAG long
SFX xR Y 16
SFX xR suivre suivre/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivant/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivi/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suit/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivent/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivait/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivaient/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivit/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivirent/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivra/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivront/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivrait/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivraient/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suive/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivît/ suivre
SFX xR suivre suivissent/ suivre

SFX xS Y 39
SFX xS ivre ivre/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivant/ vivre
SFX xS ivre is/ vivre
SFX xS ivre it/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivons/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivez/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivent/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivais/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivait/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivions/ vivre
SFX xS ivre iviez/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivaient/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écus/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écut/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écûmes/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écûtes/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écurent/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrai/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivras/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivra/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrons/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrez/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivront/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrais/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrait/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivrions/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivriez/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivraient/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ive/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ives/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écusse/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écusses/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écût/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écussions/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écussiez/ vivre
SFX xS ivre écussent/ vivre
SFX xS ivre is/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivons/ vivre
SFX xS ivre ivez/ vivre

SFX y1 Y 43
SFX y1 crire crire/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivant/ crire
SFX y1 crire crit/ crire
SFX y1 crire crits/ crire
SFX y1 crire crite/ crire
SFX y1 crire crites/ crire
SFX y1 crire cris/ crire
SFX y1 crire crit/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivons/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivez/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivent/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivais/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivait/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivions/ crire
SFX y1 crire criviez/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivaient/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivis/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivit/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivîmes/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivîtes/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivirent/ crire
SFX y1 crire crirai/ crire
SFX y1 crire criras/ crire
SFX y1 crire crira/ crire
SFX y1 crire crirons/ crire
SFX y1 crire crirez/ crire
SFX y1 crire criront/ crire
SFX y1 crire crirais/ crire
SFX y1 crire crirait/ crire
SFX y1 crire cririons/ crire
SFX y1 crire cririez/ crire
SFX y1 crire criraient/ crire
SFX y1 crire crive/ crire
SFX y1 crire crives/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivisse/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivisses/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivît/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivissions/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivissiez/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivissent/ crire
SFX y1 crire cris/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivons/ crire
SFX y1 crire crivez/ crire

SFX yA Y 43
SFX yA ire ire/ lire
SFX yA ire isant/ lire
SFX yA ire u/ lire
SFX yA ire us/ lire
SFX yA ire ue/ lire
SFX yA ire ues/ lire
SFX yA ire is/ lire
SFX yA ire it/ lire
SFX yA ire isons/ lire
SFX yA ire isez/ lire
SFX yA ire isent/ lire
SFX yA ire isais/ lire
SFX yA ire isait/ lire
SFX yA ire isions/ lire
SFX yA ire isiez/ lire
SFX yA ire isaient/ lire
SFX yA ire us/ lire
SFX yA ire ut/ lire
SFX yA ire ûmes/ lire
SFX yA ire ûtes/ lire
SFX yA ire urent/ lire
SFX yA ire irai/ lire
SFX yA ire iras/ lire
SFX yA ire ira/ lire
SFX yA ire irons/ lire
SFX yA ire irez/ lire
SFX yA ire iront/ lire
SFX yA ire irais/ lire
SFX yA ire irait/ lire
SFX yA ire irions/ lire
SFX yA ire iriez/ lire
SFX yA ire iraient/ lire
SFX yA ire ise/ lire
SFX yA ire ises/ lire
SFX yA ire usse/ lire
SFX yA ire usses/ lire
SFX yA ire ût/ lire
SFX yA ire ussions/ lire
SFX yA ire ussiez/ lire
SFX yA ire ussent/ lire
SFX yA ire is/ lire
SFX yA ire isons/ lire
SFX yA ire isez/ lire

SFX yB Y 43
SFX yB lire lire/ lire
SFX yB lire lisant/ lire
SFX yB lire lu/ lire
SFX yB lire lus/ lire
SFX yB lire lue/ lire
SFX yB lire lues/ lire
SFX yB lire lis/ lire
SFX yB lire lit/ lire
SFX yB lire lisons/ lire
SFX yB lire lisez/ lire
SFX yB lire lisent/ lire
SFX yB lire lisais/ lire
SFX yB lire lisait/ lire
SFX yB lire lisions/ lire
SFX yB lire lisiez/ lire
SFX yB lire lisaient/ lire
SFX yB lire lus/ lire
SFX yB lire lut/ lire
SFX yB lire lûmes/ lire
SFX yB lire lûtes/ lire
SFX yB lire lurent/ lire
SFX yB lire lirai/ lire
SFX yB lire liras/ lire
SFX yB lire lira/ lire
SFX yB lire lirons/ lire
SFX yB lire lirez/ lire
SFX yB lire liront/ lire
SFX yB lire lirais/ lire
SFX yB lire lirait/ lire
SFX yB lire lirions/ lire
SFX yB lire liriez/ lire
SFX yB lire liraient/ lire
SFX yB lire lise/ lire
SFX yB lire lises/ lire
SFX yB lire lusse/ lire
SFX yB lire lusses/ lire
SFX yB lire lût/ lire
SFX yB lire lussions/ lire
SFX yB lire lussiez/ lire
SFX yB lire lussent/ lire
SFX yB lire lis/ lire
SFX yB lire lisons/ lire
SFX yB lire lisez/ lire

SFX yC Y 41
SFX yC ire ire/ dire
SFX yC ire isant/ dire
SFX yC ire it/ dire
SFX yC ire its/ dire
SFX yC ire ite/ dire
SFX yC ire ites/ dire
SFX yC ire is/ dire
SFX yC ire it/ dire
SFX yC ire isons/ dire
SFX yC ire ites/ dire
SFX yC ire isent/ dire
SFX yC ire isais/ dire
SFX yC ire isait/ dire
SFX yC ire isions/ dire
SFX yC ire isiez/ dire
SFX yC ire isaient/ dire
SFX yC ire îmes/ dire
SFX yC ire îtes/ dire
SFX yC ire irent/ dire
SFX yC ire irai/ dire
SFX yC ire iras/ dire
SFX yC ire ira/ dire
SFX yC ire irons/ dire
SFX yC ire irez/ dire
SFX yC ire iront/ dire
SFX yC ire irais/ dire
SFX yC ire irait/ dire
SFX yC ire irions/ dire
SFX yC ire iriez/ dire
SFX yC ire iraient/ dire
SFX yC ire ise/ dire
SFX yC ire ises/ dire
SFX yC ire isse/ dire
SFX yC ire isses/ dire
SFX yC ire ît/ dire
SFX yC ire issions/ dire
SFX yC ire issiez/ dire
SFX yC ire issent/ dire
SFX yC ire is/ dire
SFX yC ire isons/ dire
SFX yC ire ites/ dire

SFX yD Y 41
SFX yD dire dire/ dire
SFX yD dire disant/ dire
SFX yD dire dit/ dire
SFX yD dire dits/ dire
SFX yD dire dite/ dire
SFX yD dire dites/ dire
SFX yD dire dis/ dire
SFX yD dire dit/ dire
SFX yD dire disons/ dire
SFX yD dire disez/ dire
SFX yD dire disent/ dire
SFX yD dire disais/ dire
SFX yD dire disait/ dire
SFX yD dire disions/ dire
SFX yD dire disiez/ dire
SFX yD dire disaient/ dire
SFX yD dire dîmes/ dire
SFX yD dire dîtes/ dire
SFX yD dire dirent/ dire
SFX yD dire dirai/ dire
SFX yD dire diras/ dire
SFX yD dire dira/ dire
SFX yD dire dirons/ dire
SFX yD dire direz/ dire
SFX yD dire diront/ dire
SFX yD dire dirais/ dire
SFX yD dire dirait/ dire
SFX yD dire dirions/ dire
SFX yD dire diriez/ dire
SFX yD dire diraient/ dire
SFX yD dire dise/ dire
SFX yD dire dises/ dire
SFX yD dire disse/ dire
SFX yD dire disses/ dire
SFX yD dire dît/ dire
SFX yD dire dissions/ dire
SFX yD dire dissiez/ dire
SFX yD dire dissent/ dire
SFX yD dire dis/ dire
SFX yD dire disons/ dire
SFX yD dire disez/ dire

SFX yE Y 38
SFX yE édire édire/ édire
SFX yE édire édisant/ édire
SFX yE édire édit/ édire
SFX yE édire édis/ édire
SFX yE édire édit/ édire
SFX yE édire édisons/ édire
SFX yE édire édisez/ édire
SFX yE édire édisent/ édire
SFX yE édire édisais/ édire
SFX yE édire édisait/ édire
SFX yE édire édisions/ édire
SFX yE édire édisiez/ édire
SFX yE édire édisaient/ édire
SFX yE édire édîmes/ édire
SFX yE édire édîtes/ édire
SFX yE édire édirent/ édire
SFX yE édire édirai/ édire
SFX yE édire édiras/ édire
SFX yE édire édira/ édire
SFX yE édire édirons/ édire
SFX yE édire édirez/ édire
SFX yE édire édiront/ édire
SFX yE édire édirais/ édire
SFX yE édire édirait/ édire
SFX yE édire édirions/ édire
SFX yE édire édiriez/ édire
SFX yE édire édiraient/ édire
SFX yE édire édise/ édire
SFX yE édire édises/ édire
SFX yE édire édisse/ édire
SFX yE édire édisses/ édire
SFX yE édire édît/ édire
SFX yE édire édissions/ édire
SFX yE édire édissiez/ édire
SFX yE édire édissent/ édire
SFX yE édire édis/ édire
SFX yE édire édisons/ édire
SFX yE édire édisez/ édire
